Utah statutes.
73-3b-401.   Revocation or suspension of recharge and recovery permits.

The state engineer may:

(1)  periodically review a project to determine if the person who holds the recharge or recovery permit is complying with the conditions of the permit; and

(2)  permanently revoke or temporarily suspend a permit for good cause after an investigation and a hearing.

